South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S1079.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - Building Codes Council, relating to International Fuel Gas Code, designated as Regulation Document Number 5427, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Building Codes Council proposes to amend Chapter 8, Article 10, to reflect modifications to the 2024 South Carolina Building Codes, the International Fuel Gas Code. A Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 27, 2025. ----XX----